Connecticut, session 2026, SB00202.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by
the Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of commemorating
the service and sacrifice of veterans of the Philippine-American War as
part of the Connecticut State Veterans Memorial in Minuteman Park in
the city of Hartford.